Tennessee, session 114, SB0666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-819, is amended by deleting
the language "February 1" and substituting "July 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0666
002211
- 1 -